src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NID+Poss+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:omibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:omiban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:om EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:owaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:owaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:owaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:oban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3PlObvPoss:oniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3PlProxPoss:owaa EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3SgObvPoss:oniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cy                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary
0:%>%> NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cy                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cy                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cy_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NID_Class=NID_Cy_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cy, Prefix: N, Order: Other                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Stems
bikwaajy:bikwaajy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
diseyaaby:diseyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
diskweyaaby:diskweyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
disy:disy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
iinzoby:iinzoby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
indishkweninjy:indishkweninjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
indoondaneyaaby:indoondaneyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
jiideyaaby:jiideyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
jiidy:jiidy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
jiishtadeyaaby:jiishtadeyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
migy:migy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nagaakininjy:nagaakininjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nagizhy:nagizhy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nashkidy:nashkidy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nimidechininjy:nimidechininjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nimigy:nimigy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
ninaawininjy:ninaawininjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nindoondaneyaaby:nindoondaneyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
ningwy:ningwy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
nininjy:nininjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
ninjy:ninjy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
odisiiyaaby:odisiiyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
ojiitadeyaaby:ojiitadeyaaby2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
shkinzhy:shkinzhy2 NID_Class=NID_Cy_Boundary ;
